el: Τύπος σύνδεσης νουντσάκ: Αλυσίδα με ρουλεμάν; Καλώδιο; Κορδόνι; Σχοινί paracord; Σχοινί; Τυπική αλυσίδα; Περιστρεφόμενη αλυσίδα; Άλλο
ja: ヌンチャクコネクタータイプ: ボールベアリングチェーン; ケーブル; コード; パラコードロープ; ロープ; スタンダードチェーン; スイベルチェーン; その他
lt-LT: Nunchaku jungties tipas: Grandinė su rutuliniais guoliais; Trosas; Virvutė; Parakordo virvė; Virvė; Standartinė grandinė; Sukamoji grandinė; Kita
zh-CN: 双节棍连接器类型: 滚珠轴承链; 线缆; 绳索; 伞绳; 绳; 标准链条; 旋转链; 其他
vi: Loại đầu nối côn nhị khúc: Xích có vòng bi; Cáp; Dây; Dây dù paracord; Dây thừng; Xích tiêu chuẩn; Xích có khớp xoay; Khác
cs: Typ konektoru nunčaku: Řetěz s kuličkovým ložiskem; Kabel; Provaz; Lano z paracordu; Lano; Standardní řetěz; Otočný řetěz; Ostatní
zh-TW: 雙節棍連接類型: 滾珠軸承鏈條; 纜線; 繩索; 傘繩; 繩子; 標準鏈條; 旋轉鏈條; 其他
de: Verbindungstyp des Nunchucks: Kugellager-Kette; Kabel; Schnur; Paracord-Seil; Seil; Standardkette; Drehwirbelkette; Andere
sk-SK: Typ konektora nunčakov: Reťaz s guľôčkovým ložiskom; Kábel; Šnúra; Paracordové lano; Lano; Štandardná reťaz; Otočná reťaz; Iné
nl: Nunchuck connectortype: Kogellagerketting; Kabel; Koord; Paracord-touw; Touw; Standaardketting; Ketting met wartel; Overig
fi: Nunchakun kapuloiden yhdistäjä: Kuulalaakeroitu ketju; Kaapeli; Naru; Paracord-köysi; Köysi; Vakioketju; Leikariketju; Muu
ru: Тип соединителя нунчаков: Цепь с шарикоподшипником; Трос; Шнур; Паракорд; Веревка; Стандартная цепь; Цепь с вертлюгом; Другое
pt-PT: Conector tipo Nunchuck: Corrente de rolamento; Cabo; Cordão; Corda paracord; Corda; Corrente padrão; Corrente giratória; Outro
pl: Typ złącza nunchucka: Łańcuch z łożyskiem kulkowym; Linka metalowa; Sznur; Linka paracord; Lina; Standardowy łańcuch; Łańcuch obrotowy; Inne
ko: 쌍절곤 커넥터 유형: 볼 베어링 체인; 케이블; 코드; 파라코드 로프; 로프; 표준 체인; 스위블 체인; 기타
en: Nunchuck connector type: Ball bearing chain; Cable; Cord; Paracord rope; Rope; Standard chain; Swivel chain; Other
th: ประเภทขั้วต่อของนันชัก: โซ่ลูกปืน; สายเคเบิล; สายเชือก; เชือกพาราคอร์ด; เชือก; โซ่แบบมาตรฐาน; โซ่แบบหมุนได้; อื่นๆ
pt-BR: Nunchaku conector tipo: Corrente com rolamento; Cabo; Corda; Corda paracord; Corda; Corrente padrão; Corrente com distorcedor; Outro
da: Forbindelsestype for nunchaku: Kuglelejekæde; Kabel; Snor; Paracord; Reb; Standardkæde; Kæde med drejeled; Andet
sv: Nunchuck-anslutningstyp: Kullagerkedja; Kabel; Snöre; Paracord-rep; Rep; Standardkedja; Svivelkedja; Övrigt
tr: Nunchaku bağlantı tipi: Rulmanlı zincir; Kablo; Kordon; Paraşüt ipi; İp; Standart zincir; Döner zincir; Diğer
it: Tipo di collegamento del nunchaku: Catena con cuscinetti a sfera; Cavo; Corda; Corda paracord; Fune; Catena standard; Catena girevole; Altro
ro-RO: Tipul conectorului pentru controlerul secundar de tip joystick: Lanț cu rulmenți; Cablu; Șnur; Frânghie din paracord; Frânghie; Lanț standard; Lanț pivotant; Altele
sl-SI: Vrsta priključka za nunčake: Veriga s krogličnim ležajem; Kabel; Vrvica; Vrv paracord; Vrv; Standardna veriga; Vrtljiva veriga; Drugo
es: Tipo de conexión del nunchaku: Cadena con rodamiento de bolas; Cable; Cuerda; Cuerda de paracaídas; Soga; Cadena estándar; Cadena giratoria; Otro
bg-BG: Тип свързване на нунчаку: Верига със сачмени лагери; Кабел; Връв; Въже от паракорд; Въже; Стандартна верига; Въртяща се верига; Друго
hr-HR: Nunchuck mehanizam sinkronizacije tipa: Lanac s kugličnim ležajevima; Kabel; Uzica; Uže od padobranske uzice (paracord); Uže; Standardni lanac; Okretni lanac; Ostalo
hu: Nuncsaku összekötőjének típusa: Golyóscsapágyas lánc; Kábel; Zsinór; Paracord kötél; Kötél; Hagyományos lánc; Forgószemes lánc; Egyéb
nb: Nunchuck-koblingstype: Kulelagerkjede; Kabel; Snor; Paracord-tau; Tau; Standardkjede; Svirvelkjede; Annet
fr: Type de liaison du nunchaku: Chaîne à roulement à billes; Câble; Cordon; Corde en paracorde; Corde; Chaîne standard; Chaîne pivotante; Autre